Vermont statutes. TITLE 10A Vermont Fish and Wildlife Regulations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 1.
Wild animals generally.

Wild animals, other than protected birds or game or furbearing animals, may be taken at any time, by any lawful means, by any person, holding a valid license for such taking or by any person permitted by law to take game without a license.

HISTORY:
Added

1961, No. 119
, § 2, eff. May 9, 1961.

§ 2.
Report, big game.

Unless otherwise specified in the 10 App. V.S.A. section relating to the specific big game species, a person taking big game, as defined by

10 V.S.A. § 4001(31)
, pursuant to the seasons provided by law or regulation of the Fish and Wildlife Board, shall within 48 hours report the taking and exhibit the carcass in the manner required by the Commissioner. The Commissioner
may authorize a person taking big game to report in the following manners including but not limited to; electronic reporting via email or website or mobile application, telephone, or in-person reporting. The Commissioner may waive
the exhibition of the carcass unless requested by a warden. The Commissioner shall publish the reporting and exhibition requirements.

Notwithstanding the reporting requirements of 10 App. V.S.A. § 7 subsection 8.3 of the Bear Management Rule and 10 App. V.S.A. § 33 subsection 14.3 of the Moose Management Rule, in the event of an emergency, the Commissioner may authorize any person who
takes big game to report and exhibit the carcass in the manner required by the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall publish the reporting and exhibition requirements during the emergency period. For the purposes of this section,
“emergency” shall mean “a serious, unexpected, and dangerous situation that poses a threat to public health or safety, or to wildlife or natural resources, and requires immediate action.”

No big game carcass shall be transported out of the State without first being reported as required herein.

The Commissioner shall pay to the authorized agent a fee of $1.00 for each report taken on species where reports are required by law.

HISTORY:
Added

1961, No. 119
, § 2, eff. May 9, 1961; amended

1963, No. 144
;

1971, No. 84
, § 5; 1976, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. —, eff. Jan. 1, 1977;

1977, No. 225
(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. April 12, 1978; 1982, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 935, § 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1982;

1985, No. 120
(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 16, 1986; 1993, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 996, eff. April 22, 1993; 2019 (Adj. Sess.) Fish and Wildlife Reg, eff. Oct. 23, 2020.

§ 2a.
Big game; tagging.

A person taking big game, as defined by

10 V.S.A. § 4001(31)
, pursuant to the seasons provided by law or regulation of the Fish and Wildlife Board, shall immediately tag the big game carcass upon taking. The tag shall be placed on the big game carcass in a location that is
open to view. Such tag shall remain on the big game carcass during possession and transportation and until such time that the animal is cut up for consumption.

A person shall not transport parts of a big game animal unless the parts or package containing them are marked with the name and address of the person who killed the big game.

A person may transport into and possess in this state big game legally taken in another state or country provided such person shall retain the tag required to be attached to the carcass by the state or country where taken and mark each package of meat
with the name of the person who took the animal, tag number, date, and state or country of origin.

HISTORY:
Added 1968, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 778, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended 1985, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 957, eff. July 5, 1985; 1987, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 957, eff. Jan 1, 1987; 1989, Fish and Wildlife
Board Reg. No. 957, eff. Nov. 24, 1989; 1992, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 957, eff. Nov. 14, 1992; 2008, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 957, eff. Sept. 6, 2008.

§ 2b.
Wildlife Management Units.

Annual Public Meetings.

Five Regions are established for annual public meetings on deer herd management pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4081(f)
. The Regions are comprised of Wildlife Management Units (WMU)s,, as delineated in section 2.0 below, and are as follows:

WMU boundaries.

The WMU district boundaries are all those lands enclosed within the boundary lines described for each unit as follows:

Unit A
— All of Grand Isle County including the islands.

Unit B
— Beginning at the junction of the United States/Canadian Border and the Grand Isle/Franklin Counties Border proceed east along the Canadian Border to its intersection with State Route 139 in Richford. Then proceed
southerly along that road to State Route 105. Continue southerly along Route 105 to State Route 108 in Enosburg Falls and then southerly along Route 108 to its intersection with the Upper Pleasant Valley Road (Cambridge T.H.
#5) in Jeffersonville. Continue southerly along the Upper Pleasant Valley Road to the Pleasant Valley Road and then southerly along the Pleasant Valley Road (Cambridge T.H. #1, Underhill T.H. #1) which becomes River Road (Jericho
T.H. #5) and along that road to State Route 15. Then south along Route 15 to the Brown’s Trace Road (Jericho T.H. #1, #3, and #4) and along that road which becomes the Jericho Road (Richmond T.H. #4). Continue along the Jericho
Road to Bridge Street in Richmond and along Bridge Street to the Winooski River. Then westerly along the Winooski River to its mouth at Lake Champlain and then in a northwesterly direction to the Grand Isle/Chittenden County
Border. Then north along that border to the point of beginning.

Unit C
— Beginning at the junction of the United States/Canadian Border and State Route 139 in Richford proceed east along the Canadian Border to State Route 243 in North Troy. Then proceed southerly along that road to
State Route 105. Then southerly along Route 105 to State Route 101 and southerly along Route 101 to State Route 100 in Troy. Continue south along Route 100 to State Route 15 in Hyde Park then west along Route 15 to State Route
108 in Jeffersonville. Then north along Route 108 to State Route 105 in Enosburg Falls and north along Route 105 to State Route 139 and north along Route 139 to the point of beginning.

Unit D
— Beginning at the United States/Canadian Border and State Route 243 in North Troy proceed east along the Canadian Border to Line Farm Road (Holland T.H. #13) in Holland. Then south along that road to Holland Pond
Road (Holland T.H. #4 & #19). Then west, turning south on Holland Pond Road to Valley Road (Holland T.H. #1, Morgan T.H. #1). Continue south along Valley Road to State Route 111 in Morgan. Then east on Route 111 to State
Route 114. Then proceed south along Route 114 to State Routes 114/105, and continue south on Route 114 to Mountain Road (Burke #7) in East Burke. Then east on Mountain Road to Kirby Road (Burke T.H. #8, Lyndon T.H. #7) then
south on Kirby Road which becomes Ridge Road (Kirby T.H. #1), continue south on Ridge Road to Kirby Mountain Road (Kirby T.H. #29) and south on that road to Ranney Hill Road (Kirby T.H. #29) and east on that road to Wood Lane
(Kirby T.H. #29) and then south on Wood Lane which becomes Brook Road (Concord T.H. #66) to U.S. Route 2 Concord. Then west along U.S. Route 2 to State Route 15 in West Danville and west along Route 15 to State Route 100 in
Hyde Park. Then north along Route 100 to State Route 101 in Troy and north along Route 101 to State Route 105. Continue north along Route 105 to State Route 243, then north along Route 243 to the point of beginning. Wildlife
Management Unit D is subdivided into subunits D1 and D2.

Subunit D1
— is that part of Unit “D” lying

West
of a line commencing at the junction of State Routes 15 and 16 in Hardwick and proceeding northerly along State Route 16 to State Route 5A in Westmore, then northerly on Route 5A to Hudson Road (Charleston T.H.
#1) in Charleston. Then southeast on Hudson Road to State Route 105. Continue southeast on Route 105 ending at its junction with State Route 114 in Brighton.

Subunit D2
— is that part of Unit “D” lying

East
of a line commencing at the junction of State Routes 15 and 16 in Hardwick and proceeding northerly along State Route 16 to State Route 5A in Westmore, then northerly on Route 5A to Hudson Road (Charleston T.H.
#1) in Charleston. Then southeast on Hudson Road to State Route 105. Continue southeast on Route 105 ending at its junction with State Route 114 in Brighton.

Unit E
— Beginning at the United States/Canadian Border and Line Farm Road (Holland T.H. #13) in Holland proceed east along the Canadian Border to the Vermont/New Hampshire Border at Canaan. Then south along the New Hampshire
Border to U.S. Route 2 in Guildhall. Then west along U.S. Route 2 to Brook Road (Concord T.H. #66) in Concord. Then north on Brook Road which becomes Wood Lane (Kirby T.H. #29), then west on Ranney Hill Road (Kirby T.H. #29)
to Kirby Mountain Road (Kirby T.H. #29) then north on that road to Ridge Road (Kirby T.H. #1). Continue north on Ridge Road which becomes Kirby Road (Burke T.H. #8, Lyndon T.H. #7) and north on that road to Mountain Road (Burke
T.H. #7) and west on Mountain Road to State Route 114 in East Burke. Then north along Route 114 to State Routes 114/105, continue north on Route 114 State Route 111 in Morgan. Then west along Route 111 to Valley Road (Morgan
T.H. #1, Holland T.H. #1) and north on Valley Road to Holland Pond Road (Holland T.H. #4 & #19). Continue north, then east on Holland Pond Road to Line Farm Road (Holland T.H. #13) then north on that road to the point of
beginning. Wildlife Management Unit E is subdivided into subunits E1 and E2.

Subunit E1
— All of the Unit E as described previously north of State Route 105.

Subunit E2
— All of the Unit E as described previously south of State Route 105.

Unit F
— Beginning at the mouth of the Winooski River at Lake Champlain in Colchester proceed east along the river to Bridge Street in Richmond. Then south along Bridge Street to Huntington Road (Richmond T.H. #1), and
south along it where it becomes Main Road (Huntington T.H. #1) continuing south to the Hinesburg Hollow Road (Huntington T.H. #2, Starksboro T.H. #2). Then west along the Hinesburg Hollow Road which becomes Hollow Road (Hinesburg
T.H. #5) to State Route 116. Continue south along Route 116 to State Route 125 in East Middlebury and then east on that road to the Upper Plains Road (Middlebury T.H. #11, Salisbury #5). Then south along that road to State
Route 53 and along it to State Route 73 in Forest Dale. Proceed westerly on Route 73 to Mount Independence Road (Orwell T.H. #2) in Orwell. Then westerly on that road to Chipman’s Point Road (Orwell T.H. #2), and west on that
road to Lake Champlain. Then on a west line to the Vermont/New York Border and then north along New York Border to the Grand Isle County Border. Then southeast to the mouth of the Winooski River and the point of beginning.
Wildlife Management Unit F is subdivided into subunits F1 and F2.

Subunit F1
— is that part of Unit “F” lying

West
of a line commencing at the junction of State Routes 22A and 73 in the Town of Orwell, then proceeding northerly along Route 22A to State Route 74 in Shoreham, then northerly along Route 74 to State Route 30 in
Cornwall. Continue northerly along Route 30 to U.S. Route 7 in Middlebury then northerly along U.S. Route 7 to the Monkton Road (Ferrisburg T.H. #2, Monkton T.H. #1) in Ferrisburg. Then northerly along the Monkton Road which
becomes Silver Street (Hinesburg T.H. #4) to State Route 116 in Hinesburg and northerly along Route 116 to State Route 2A in St. George and then northerly along 2A ending at its junction with the Winooski River in Williston.

Subunit F2
— is that part of Unit “F” lying

East
of a line commencing at the junction of State Routes 22A and 73 in the Town of Orwell, then proceeding northerly along Route 22A to State Route 74 in Shoreham, then northerly along Route 74 to State Route 30 in
Cornwall. Continue northerly along Route 30 to U.S. Route 7 in Middlebury then northerly along U.S. Route 7 to the Monkton Road (Ferrisburg T.H. #2, Monkton T.H. #1) in Ferrisburg. Then northerly along the Monkton Road which
becomes Silver Street (Hinesburg T.H. #4) to State Route 116 in Hinesburg and northerly along Route 116 to State Route 2A in St. George and then northerly along Route 2A ending at its junction with the Winooski River in Williston.

Unit G
— Beginning at the junction of State Route 108 and the Upper Pleasant Valley Road (Cambridge T.H. #5) in Jeffersonville proceed north on Route 108 to State Route 15. Then east on Route 15 to State Route 100 in
Morrisville and then south on that road to State Route 17 in Waitsfield. Continue westerly along Route 17 to State Route 116 in Bristol then north along that road to Hollow Road (Hinesburg T.H. #5). Proceed easterly along Hollow
Road which becomes Hinesburg Hollow Road (Starksboro T.H. #2, Huntington T.H. #2) to Main Road (Huntington T.H. #1) then north on Main Road which becomes Huntington Road (Richmond T.H. #1) and along that road to Bridge Street
in Richmond. Continue along Bridge Street to the Jericho Road (Richmond T.H. #4) and north along Jericho Road which becomes Brown’s Trace Road (Jericho T.H. #1, #3, #4) to State Route 15 and along Route 15 to River Road (Jericho
T.H. #5) which turns into the Pleasant Valley Road (Underhill T.H. #1, Cambridge #1). Continue on that road to the Upper Pleasant Valley Road (Cambridge T.H. #5) and northerly along it to the point of beginning.

Unit H
— Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 15 and 100 in Morristown, proceed east along Route 15 to U.S. Route 2 in West Danville. Then east along U.S. Route 2 Peacham Road (Danville T.H. #3) in Danville,
then south on the Peacham Road which becomes the Peacham Danville Road, then becomes the Bayley-Hazen Road (Peacham T.H. #1) to Peacham where it becomes South Main Street (Peacham T.H. #1). Continue south along that road which
then becomes the Peacham Groton Road (Peacham T.H. #3) changing to Peacham Road (Barnet T.H. #4, Ryegate T.H. #4) to Groton where it becomes Minard Hill Road (Groton T.H. #2). Continue south on that road to U.S. Route 302.
Proceed west on U.S. Route 302 to U.S. Route 2 in Montpelier and then westerly along U.S. Route 2 to State Route 100 in Waterbury. Then north along Route 100 to the point of beginning.

Unit I
— Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 116 and 17 in Bristol, proceed east along Route 17 to State Route 100 in Waitsfield. Then south along Route 100 to U.S. Route 4 in Killington, and then west on U.S.
Route 4 to U.S. Route 7 in Rutland. Then north along U.S. Route 7 to State Route 73 in Brandon. Then easterly along Route 73 to State Route 53 in Forest Dale and north along Route 53 to the Upper Plains Road (Salisbury T.H.
#5, Middlebury T.H. #11). Proceed north along the Upper Plains Road to State Route 125 in East Middlebury and west along Route 125 to State Route 116, then north along Route 116 to the point of beginning.

Unit J
— Beginning at the intersection of State Route 100 and U.S. Route 2 in North Moretown proceed east on U.S. Route 2 to U.S. Route 302 in Montpelier and along U.S. Route 302 to Minard Hill Road (Groton T.H. #2) in
Groton. Then northerly on Minard Hill Road which then becomes Peacham Road (Barnet T.H. #4, Ryegate T.H. #4). Continue north along that road which then becomes the Peacham Groton Road (Peacham T.H. #3) to South Peacham where
it becomes South Main Street (Peacham T.H. #1). Continue north on that road which becomes the Bayley-Hazen Road then becomes the Peacham Danville Road (Peacham T.H. #1) to Danville where it becomes the Peacham Road (Danville
T.H. #3). Continue north on that road to U.S. Route 2. Proceed east along U.S Route 2 to the Vermont/New Hampshire Border in Guildhall. Then south along the New Hampshire border to U.S. Route 4 in White River Junction and then
west on U.S. Route 4 to State Route 14 and west along Route 14 to State Route 107 in North Royalton. Continue west on Route 107 to State Route 100 in Stockbridge and north along Route 100 to the point of beginning. Wildlife
Management Unit “J” is subdivided into subunits J1 and J2.

Subunit J1
— is that part of Unit “J” lying

West
of a line commencing at the junction of State Routes 14 and 110 in South Royalton, then proceeding northerly along Route 110 ending at its junction with U.S. Route 302 in East Barre.

Subunit J2
— is that part of Unit “J” lying

East
of a line commencing at the junction of State Routes 14 and 110 in South Royalton, then proceeding northerly along Route 110 ending at its junction with U.S. Route 302 in East Barre.

Unit K
— Beginning at the Vermont/New York Border off Chipman’s Point Road in Orwell, proceed east along Chipman’s Point Road to Mount Independence Road (Orwell T.H. #2) and along that road to State Route 73. Continue
east on Route 73 to U.S. Route 7 in Brandon. Then south along U.S. Route 7 to Mt Tabor Ave (Mt. Tabor T.H. #1) in Mt. Tabor and west along that road to Brook Road (Danby T.H. #1). Then west on Brook Road to the Danby/Pawlet
Road (Danby T.H. #1, Pawlet T.H. #4). Then west along that road to State Route 133 in Pawlet and along Route 133 to State Route 30, then westerly along Route 30 to State Route 149 and along Route 149 to the Vermont/New York
Border. Then north along the New York Border to the point of beginning.

Unit L
— Beginning at the intersection of U.S. Routes 4 and 7 in Rutland, proceed east along U.S. Route 4 to State Route 100 in Bridgewater. Then south along Route 100 to State Route 30 in Rawsonville and then west along
Route 30 to the junction of State Route 11 in Winhall. Continue west on Routes 11/30 to U.S. Route 7 in Manchester and north along U.S. Route 7 to the point of beginning.

Unit M
— Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 100 and 107 in Stockbridge proceed east on Route 107 to State Route 12. Then south on Route 12 to US Route 4 in Woodstock. Then west on Route 4 to State Route 106
and continue south on Route 106 to State Route 131 in Weathersfield, proceed west on Route 131 to State Route 103 in Proctorsville. Then south on Route 103 to State Route 11 to State Route 35 in Chester. Continue south on Route
35 to State Route 35/121 in Grafton. Then south on Route 35 to State Route 30 in Townshend. Then northwesterly on Route 30 to State Routes 30 and 100. Then north on Vermont Routes 30/100 to Rawsonville, continuing north on
Route 100 to the point of beginning.

Unit N
— Beginning at the junction of State Route 149 and the Vermont/New York Border proceed east on Route 149 to State Route 30 then southeast on Route 30 to State Route 133. Continue easterly on Route 133 to the Danby/Pawlet
Road (Pawlet T.H. #4) and easterly along that road to Brook Road (Danby T.H. #1). Continue east on Brook Road to Mt. Tabor Ave (Mt. Tabor T.H. #1) and continue east to its junction with U.S Route 7 in Mt. Tabor, then south
on U.S. Route 7 to State Route 9 in Bennington. Then east on Route 9 to South Branch Street in Bennington and south to Beech Street and then south along it to South Stream Road (Bennington T.H. #3, Pownal T.H. #3) continuing
south on that road which becomes Barber Pond Road and along it to U.S. Route 7 in Pownal. Then south along U.S. Route 7 to the Vermont/Massachusetts Border and then west along the Massachusetts Border to the Vermont/New York
Border and north along the New York Border to the point of beginning.

Unit O
— Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 107 and 14 in North Royalton proceed easterly along Route 14 to U.S. Route 4 in White River Jct. Then east along U.S. Route 4 to the Vermont/New Hampshire Border.
Then south along the New Hampshire Border to the Vermont/Massachusetts Border. Then west along the Massachusetts Border to Stark Mountain Road in Halifax (Halifax T.H. 39). Then north on Stark Mountain Road to Amidon Road (Halifax
T.H. 32). Continue north on Amidon Road to Jacksonville Stage Road (Halifax T.H. 2) in Grove. Then northeast along Jacksonville Stage Road which becomes Stage Road (Guilford T.H. 1) to Guilford Center. Continue northeast on
Guilford Center Road (Guilford T.H. 1) to U.S. Route 5 in Guilford. Then north on U.S Route 5 to Interstate 91 at Exit 1. Then northerly along Interstate 91 to State Route 30 in Brattleboro and along Route 30 to State Route
35 in Townshend. Then north on Route 35 to State Route 35/121 in Grafton. Then north on Route 35 to State Route 11 to State Route 103 in Chester. Continue north on Route 103 to State Route 131 in Proctorsville. Then easterly
on Route 131 to State Route 106 in Weathersfield. Then northerly on Route 106 to U.S. Route 4 in Woodstock. Then east on U.S. Route 4 to State Route 12 and north on Route 12 to State Route 107 near Stockbridge. Then easterly
on Route 107 to the point of beginning.

Unit P
— Beginning at the intersection of U.S. Route 7 and State Routes 11 and 30 in Manchester proceed east on Routes 11/30 to their junction in Winhall. Continue southeast on Route 30 to State Routes 30 and 100 in Rawsonville
and then south on Routes 30/100 to East Jamaica. Continue south on Route 100 to State Route 112 in Jacksonville. Then along Route 112 to State Route 8A and south along Route 8A to the Vermont/Massachusetts Border. Then west
along the Massachusetts Border to U.S. Route 7 in Pownal and then north on U.S. Route 7 to Barber Pond Road (Pownal T.H. #3) then northeast along that road which becomes South Stream Road (Bennington T.H. #3) to Beech Street
in Bennington and then on South Branch Street to State Route 9. Then west on Route 9 to U.S. Route 7 and then north on U.S. Route 7 to the point of beginning.

Unit Q
— Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 100 and 30 in East Jamaica proceed southeast on Route 30 to Interstate 91, then proceed south along Interstate 91 to U.S. Route 5 at Exit 1. Then south on U.S Route
5 to Guilford Center Road (Guilford T.H. 1). Then southwest on Guilford Center Road to Guilford Center. Continue southwest along Stage Road (Guilford (T.H. 1) which becomes Jacksonville Stage Road (Halifax T.H. 2) to Grove.
Then south on Amidon Road (Halifax T.H. 32) to Stark Mountain Road (Halifax T.H.39) and south on that road to the Vermont/Massachusetts Border and then west along the Massachusetts Border to State Route 8A. Then northerly along
Route 8A to State Route 112 in Jacksonville and then north along Route 112 to State Route 100. Proceed north along Route 100 to the point of beginning.

=gmls =gseal

Click to view

Click to view

Region 1—WMU’s A, B, C, F1, F2, G

Region 2—WMU’s D1, D2, E1, E2

Region 3—WMU’s H, I, J1, J2

Region 4—WMU’s K, L, N, P

Region 5—WMU’s M, O, Q.

Display Image

HISTORY:
Added 1974, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 877, eff. Oct. 1, 1974; amended 1985, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 957, eff. July 5, 1985; 1986, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 912, eff. Sept. 14, 1986; 1987, Fish and Wildlife
Board Reg. No. 957, eff. Jan 1, 1987; 1991, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 912, eff. Aug. 9, 1991; 1996, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 912, eff. May 5, 1996; 2013 (Adj. Sess.), Regulation of the Secretary of Natural Resources,
eff. Feb. 20, 2014.

§ 2c.
Repealed. 2013, No. 78, § 3, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 2d.
Repealed. 2019 Fish and Wildlife Board Reg., eff. January 1, 2020.

§ 3.
Rabbit, squirrel; sale.

A person shall not buy or sell wild rabbit or gray squirrel at any time.

HISTORY:
Added

1961, No. 119
, § 2, eff. May 9, 1961.

§ 4.
Bow and arrow hunting.

Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, any game which may be taken by shooting may be taken by use of bow and arrow, or by crossbow where authorized by Vermont Fish and Wildlife Board rules.

HISTORY:
Added

1961, No. 119
, § 2, eff. May 9, 1961; amended

1987, No. 159
(Adj. Sess.), § 3; 2015, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2016; 2019, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg., eff. Jan. 1, 2020.

§ 5.
Bow and arrow standards.

No person shall hunt deer with bow and arrow if the arrow has an arrowhead that measures less than seven-eighths of an inch at its widest point or that has less than two sharp cutting edges.

HISTORY:
Added

1961, No. 119
, § 2, eff. May 9, 1961; amended 1963, Fish and Game Board Reg. No.—, eff. Aug. 23, 1963.

§ 6.
Repealed.

§ 7.
Bear Management Rule.

Authority.

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4081(a)
. In adopting this rule, the Fish and Wildlife Board is following the policy established by the General Assembly that the protection, propagation, control, management, and conservation of fish, wildlife and furbearing
animals in this State is in the interest of the public welfare and that the safeguarding of this valuable resource for the people of the State requires a constant and continual vigilance.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4082
, this rule is designed to maintain the best health, population and utilization levels of the black bear population.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4084
, this rule establishes season and possession limits for black bear, and prescribes the manner and means of taking black bears.

Purpose.

The purpose of this regulation is to establish seasons for the taking of black bear, to establish legal means or methods of taking black bears, and to establish limits on the number of black bears to be taken annually.

Definitions:

“Accompany” for the purposes of hunting bear with dogs means that:

A Sub-permittee engaged in the control, handling, transporting or intercepting of Department registered dogs while hunting with dogs, shall be under the express direction of the permit holder, and

A Sub-permittee who harvests a black bear shall be under the direct control and supervision of the bear dog permit holder, including the ability to see and communicate with each other without the aid of artificial devices such as radios or binoculars,
except for medically necessary devices such as hearing aids or eyeglasses.

“Bait” means as any animal, vegetable, fruit, mineral matter, honey, or any other substance capable of luring or attracting black bear or any other wildlife.

“Baited area” means an area where any animal, vegetable, fruit, mineral matter, honey, or any other substance capable of luring or attracting black bear or any wildlife, has been placed or deposited including, but not limited to, bird feeders.

“Bear Dog Permit” or “Permit” means a permit issued by the Commissioner to a person who wishes to hunt, pursue or take black bear with the aid of dogs.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department.

“Control of Dog/Dogs” means the transportation, loading or unloading of dogs from vehicle(s); the handling, catching, restraining or releasing dogs; and the use of telemetry/GPS to locate or track dogs.

“Department” means the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department.

“Department Registered Dog” means a dog bearing a numbered identification dog-tag (Department Registration Dog-Tag) approved or issued by the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department, with the permit holder’s bear dog permit number and a number one through
six.

“Hunting with Dogs” for the purposes of this rule means that one or more dog(s) with Department Registered Dog-Tags are on the ground whether in pursuit of a black bear or not.

“Legal means” or “Legal method” means the taking of a black bear by muzzleloader, rifle, handgun, archery equipment, or crossbow.

“Pack of Dogs” means one to six dogs, acting as a unit during the pursuit of black bear.

“Sub-Permittee” means any person with a valid Vermont hunting license designated by the bear dog permit holder to assist or take a bear with the aid of dogs, in accordance with written authorization issued by the Department.

“Relaying Dogs/Packs” means the removal and replacement of one or more dog or dogs to the trail of a bear to the original pack of dogs once the pursuit has begun. If the hunting or pursuit of a black bear commences with fewer than six dogs in the original
Pack of Dogs, the addition of a dog or dogs shall not be considered relaying, provided that no more than the same six dogs are part of a single Pack of Dogs during the hunting, pursuing or taking of a black bear.

“Bear Tag” means a document issued by the Department authorizing the taking of a black bear in the current season.

“Unregistered Dog” means a dog that does not have a valid numbered dog license as described in 3.8.

Seasons and Shooting Hours.

Early and Late Season

Early Season: For Vermont Residents: September 1 through the day before the first day of the Regular Deer Season. For Non-Vermont Residents without the use of dogs: September 1 through the day before the first day of the Regular Deer Season. For Non-resident
Bear Dog Permit Holders: The early black bear season shall be open to Non-Resident bear dog permit holders on September 15 and not before.

Late Season: For Vermont Residents and Nonresidents: The first day of the Regular Deer Season through the second Sunday of the Regular Deer Season.

Shooting hours: One half hour before sunrise until one half hour after sunset.

Tags and Bag Limit.

To take a black bear during the Early Season, a person must, in addition to a having a valid Vermont Big Game Hunting license, possess an Early Season Bear Tag issued separately by the Department.

To take a black bear during the Late Season, a person must have a valid Vermont Big Game Hunting license.

A person shall not harvest more than one black bear per calendar year, not to include animals taken pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4827
.

The taking of bear with the aid of dogs.

Licenses and Permits Any person hunting, pursuing, harvesting, or in any manner involved in the taking of a black bear with the use of dogs must hold a valid Vermont Big Game Hunting License, use only Department Registered Dogs and have purchased a valid
bear tag. In addition, the person hunting, pursuing, harvesting, or in any manner involved in the taking of a black bear with the use of dogs must hold a valid bear dog permit or accompany a bear dog permit holder. The permit shall
be carried at all times by the permittee while hunting with dogs or taking black bear and exhibited to a game warden, landowner, or law enforcement officer upon demand.

Legal Methods.

A person shall not take a black bear into his/her actual possession except by killing the bear by legal means or methods.

A person taking black bear with the use of a bow and arrow or crossbow shall, upon demand of a game warden or other law enforcement personnel, show proof of having a prior archery license, or of having passed a bow hunter education course in Vermont,
another state or a province of Canada approved by the Commissioner.

Dogs and Packs.

A person shall not take black bear with the aid of dogs unless the person is in control of the dog or dogs.

No person shall take a black bear with the aid of any Unregistered Dog. No person shall have an Unregistered Dog in his or her possession while hunting, pursuing or taking a black bear.

A person hunting with dogs, pursuing, and taking black bear with the aid of dogs shall attach a Department Registration Dog-Tag and a metal identification name plate with the person’s name, address and telephone number to the dog’s collar.

A person taking a black bear with the aid of dogs shall only take a black bear with a Pack of Dogs as defined in this rule. No person shall pursue, hunt, or take black bear by Relaying Dogs/Packs.

Two or more permit holders may hunt together and combine Department Registered dog(s) to form a Pack of Dogs. The combined bear dog permit holders shall not take black bear with the aid of more than six dogs combined forming a single pack of dogs. Once
hunting with dogs commences, dogs not on the hunt shall be restrained in the dog box or inside the vehicle. The combined bear dog permit holders shall not possess any Unregistered Dogs while hunting, pursuing or taking
black bear.

Prohibitions.

No person shall place bait to attract black bear for the purposes of allowing a bear dog to catch/strike the scent of a black bear. No person take bear by using bait or a baited area.

A person shall not advertise, barter, exchange goods or services, or otherwise sell the use of a dog or dogs for the purpose of taking any black bear.

While hunting with dogs, no person shall have in their possession an Unregistered Dog while possessing Department Registered dogs.

It shall be a violation for a Vermont resident to apply for a bear dog permit for the purpose of allowing a nonresident bear dog owner to hunt bear in Vermont with the aid of dogs.

No person shall hunt black bear with a bow and arrow or crossbow if the arrow or bolt has an arrowhead that measures less than seven-eighths of an inch at its widest point or that has less than two sharp cutting edges.

Reporting.

The black bear carcass shall be field dressed prior to reporting.

Upon request of a Game Warden, the person harvesting the bear and the permit holder shall show and return to the kill site with a Game Warden.

All bear harvests shall be reported to a game warden, official Fish and Wildlife Department Reporting Station, or a person designated by the Commissioner within 48 hours. The person who harvested the bear and the bear dog permit holder must both be present
to legally report the harvest. If the bear dog permit holder harvested the bear, only he or she must be present when reporting the harvest.

It shall be unlawful to provide false information when reporting a black bear taken with the aid of dogs.

The fine, points and any other penalty for any violation of this subsection 8 shall be assessed to the violator and in addition, to the permit holder if the violator is not the permit holder.

Biological Collection.

Any person who harvests a bear shall collect a premolar tooth and submit the tooth to a game warden, official Fish and Wildlife Department Reporting Station, or to a person designated by the Commissioner to receive the biological collection, within (30)
thirty days of taking the bear.

Unless otherwise specified by statute, the failure to collect and submit a bear tooth shall not result in license suspension points and shall be considered a minor violation subject to a civil fine.

HISTORY:
Added 1972, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 845, eff. ; amended 1982, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 935, § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1982; 2007, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 935, § 1, eff. June 1, 2007; 2012, Fish and Wildlife Board
Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2013; 2017, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2017; 2017, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2018; 2019, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg., eff. Jan. 1, 2020.

§ 8.
Repealed.